New Jersey, session 222, S55.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary, a school districts total State aid in the budget year shall be no less than the school districts total State aid in the 2017-2018 school year if the school district is located in a county of the fifth or sixth class and the equalized valuation for the budget year is less than the equalized valuation for the 2012-2013 budget year. b.    As used in this section, total State aid means direct State aid provided to school districts, other than preschool education aid, extraordinary special education costs aid, school choice aid, and debt service aid. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.